Nevada, session 83, AB495.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388A.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 5 and 6, subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720 and subsection
6 of NRS 388A.274, the sponsor of a charter school shall terminate
the charter contract of the charter school or restart the charter school
under a new charter contract if the charter school receives, in any
period of [5] 3 consecutive school years, three annual ratings
established as the lowest rating possible indicating
underperformance of a public school, as determined by the
Department pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
2. [A charter school’s annual rating pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability based upon the performance of the charter
school must not be included in the count of annual ratings for the
purposes of subsection 1 for any school year before the 2015-2016
school year.
3.] If a charter contract is terminated or a charter school is
restarted pursuant to subsection 1, the sponsor of the charter school
shall submit a written report to the Department and the governing
body of the charter school setting forth the reasons for the
termination or restart of the charter school not later than 10 days
after terminating the charter contract or restarting the charter school.
[4.] 3. The provisions of NRS 388A.330 do not apply to the
termination of a charter contract or restart of the charter school
pursuant to this section.
[5.] 4. The Department shall adopt regulations governing
procedures to restart a charter school under a new charter contract
pursuant to subsection 1. Such regulations must include, without
limitation, requiring a charter school that is restarted to enroll a
pupil who was enrolled in the charter school before the school was
restarted before any other eligible pupil is enrolled.
[6.] 5. If the sponsor of a charter school determines that not all
of the elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the
-
*AB495_R1*

– 3 –
charter school meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and that
the charter school can remain financially viable if the charter school
continues to operate and serve only the elementary, middle or high
schools or campuses which do not meet the criteria described in
subsection 1, the sponsor may amend the charter contract to
eliminate the elementary, middle or high schools or campuses that
meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and limit the enrollment
in all other elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the
charter school.
6. The sponsor of a charter school described in subsection 1
is not required to terminate the charter contract of the charter
school or restart the charter school under a new charter contract
if the charter school received a rating that is:
(a) Within 5 percent of the number of points required for the
second lowest rating of performance pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools or higher; or
(b) Within 10 percent of the number of points required for the
second lowest rating of performance pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools or higher and the
charter school increased its rating from the immediately preceding
school year by at least 50 percent.
Sec. 2. 1. The Department of Education shall establish a
committee to evaluate and recommend revisions to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools set forth in NRS
385A.600 to 385A.840, inclusive.
2. The committee established pursuant to this section shall
consist of, without limitation, the following members:
(a) One member who is an employee of a school district in this
State whose duties include supervising compliance with the
statewide system of accountability for public schools, appointed by
the Department;
(b) One member who is an administrator of a public school in
this State, appointed by the Department;
(c) One member who is a licensed teacher at a public school in
this State, appointed by the Department;
(d) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents;
(e) One member appointed by the State Public Charter School
Authority;
(f) One member who is a pupil enrolled in a high school in this
State, appointed by the Department;
(g) One member from each regional training program created
pursuant to NRS 391A.120, appointed by the governing body of
each regional training program;
-
*AB495_R1*

– 4 –
(h) One member appointed by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada;
(i) One member who is a Legislator, appointed by the
Legislative Commission;
(j) One member appointed by the President of the Nevada State
Education Association;
(k) One member appointed by the Clark County Education
Association;
(l) One member who is a teacher who holds a license to teach
special education, appointed by the Department;
(m) One member who is a teacher who holds a license to teach
pupils enrolled in a program of early childhood education, appointed
by the Department;
(n) One member who is a teacher in a program for English
learners, appointed by the Department;
(o) One member from each relevant office of the Department,
appointed by the Department; and
(p) One member who is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
enrolled in a public school in this State, appointed by the
Department.
3. The committee established pursuant to this section shall
evaluate how to revise the statewide system of accountability for
public schools set forth in NRS 385A.600 to 385A.840, inclusive, so
that the system:
(a) Aligns with the standards of content and performance
established by the Council to Establish Academic Standards for
Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(b) Reflects accomplishments of pupils and whether the
outcomes of schools in this State are capable of advancing the
economic mobility of a person;
(c) Results in pupils enrolling in a postsecondary educational
institution after graduation;
(d) Results in pupils obtaining careers with livable wages after
graduation;
(e) Does not increase any reporting burden on schools and
school districts;
(f) Aligns with any existing initiatives of the Department to
increase efficiency in reporting; and
(g) Complies with all requirements of the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301, et seq., as
amended, for the continued receipt of federal money.
4. The committee established pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall, on or before June 30, 2026, submit a report describing
the findings of the evaluation conducted pursuant to this section to:
(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction; and
-
*AB495_R1*

– 5 –
(2) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.
(b) Shall be dissolved after the submission of the report pursuant
to this subsection.
Sec. 3. 1. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act expires by limitation on October 1,
2026.
H
-
*AB495_R1*